Utah statutes.
17B-1-106.   Notice before preparing or amending a long-range plan or
acquiring certain property.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  "Affected entity" means each county, municipality, local district
under this title, special service district, school district, interlocal
cooperation entity established under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal
Cooperation Act, and specified public utility:
(A)  whose services or facilities are likely to require expansion or
significant modification because of an intended use of land; or
(B)  that has filed with the local district a copy of the general or long-
range plan of the county, municipality, local district, school district,
interlocal cooperation entity, or specified public utility.
(ii)  "Affected entity" does not include the local district that is required
under this section to provide notice.
(b)  "Specified public utility" means an electrical corporation, gas
corporation, or telephone corporation, as those terms are defined in Section
54-2-1.
(2) (a)  If a local district under this title located in a county of the first
or second class prepares a long-range plan regarding its facilities proposed
for the future or amends an already existing long-range plan, the local
district shall, before preparing a long-range plan or amendments to an
existing long-range plan, provide written notice, as provided in this section,
of its intent to prepare a long-range plan or to amend an existing long-range
plan.
(b)  Each notice under Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  indicate that the local district intends to prepare a long-range plan or
to amend a long-range plan, as the case may be;
(ii)  describe or provide a map of the geographic area that will be affected
by the long-range plan or amendments to a long-range plan;
(iii)  be:
(A)  sent to each county in whose unincorporated area and each municipality in
whose boundaries is located the land on which the proposed long-range plan or
amendments to a long-range plan are expected to indicate that the proposed
facilities will be located;
(B)  sent to each affected entity;
(C)  sent to the Automated Geographic Reference Center created in Section
63F-1-506;
(D)  sent to each association of governments, established pursuant to an
interlocal agreement under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act,
of which a county or municipality described in Subsection (2)(b)(iii)(A) is a
member; and
(E) (I)  placed on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section
63F-1-701, if the local district:
(Aa)  is required under Subsection 52-4-203(3) to use that website to provide
public notice of a meeting; or
(Bb)  voluntarily chooses to place notice on that website despite not being
required to do so under Subsection (2)(b)(iii)(E)(I)(Aa); or
(II)  the state planning coordinator appointed under Section 63J-4-202, if the
local district does not provide notice on the Utah Public Notice Website under
Subsection (2)(b)(iii)(E)(I);
(iv)  with respect to the notice to counties and municipalities described in
Subsection (2)(b)(iii)(A) and affected entities, invite them to provide
information for the local district to consider in the process of preparing,
adopting, and implementing the long-range plan or amendments to a long-range
plan concerning:
(A)  impacts that the use of land proposed in the proposed long-range plan or
amendments to a long-range plan may have on the county, municipality, or
affected entity; and
(B)  uses of land that the county, municipality, or affected entity is
planning or considering that may conflict with the proposed long-range plan or
amendments to a long-range plan; and
(v)  include the address of an Internet website, if the local district has
one, and the name and telephone number of a person where more information can
be obtained concerning the local district's proposed long-range plan or
amendments to a long-range plan.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d), each local district
intending to acquire real property in a county of the first or second class
for the purpose of expanding the district's infrastructure or other facilities
used for providing the services that the district is authorized to provide
shall provide written notice, as provided in this Subsection (3), of its
intent to acquire the property if the intended use of the property is contrary
to:
(i)  the anticipated use of the property under the county or municipality's
general plan; or
(ii)  the property's current zoning designation.
(b)  Each notice under Subsection (3)(a) shall:
(i)  indicate that the local district intends to acquire real property;
(ii)  identify the real property; and
(iii)  be sent to:
(A)  each county in whose unincorporated area and each municipality in whose
boundaries the property is located; and
(B)  each affected entity.
(c)  A notice under this Subsection (3) is a protected record as provided in
Subsection 63G-2-305(7).
(d) (i)  The notice requirement of Subsection (3)(a) does not apply if the
local district previously provided notice under Subsection (2) identifying the
general location within the municipality or unincorporated part of the county
where the property to be acquired is located.
(ii)  If a local district is not required to comply with the notice
requirement of Subsection (3)(a) because of application of Subsection
(3)(d)(i), the local district shall provide the notice specified in Subsection
(3)(a) as soon as practicable after its acquisition of the real property.
